Georgia, session 2025_26, HB684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
8 SECTION 1.
9 Chapter 10 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to barbers and
10 cosmetologists, is amended by revising Code Section 43-10-12, relating to regulation and
11 licenses for schools, teachers and instructors, registration of apprentices, and certification as
12 teacher by Department of Education, as follows:
13 "43-10-12.
14 (a)(1) All schools of barbering, schools of cosmetology, schools of esthetics, schools of
15 hair design, and schools of nail care shall:
H. B. 684
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0533
16 (A) Cause to be registered in writing with the board, at the time of opening, 15 bona
17 fide students; provided, however, that any such school may petition to the board to add
18 additional courses of study with a minimum of five students per course if such school
19 has an active license in good standing;
20 (B) Have not less than one instructor for every 20 students or a fraction thereof;
21 (C) Keep permanently displayed a sign reading 'School of Cosmetology,' 'School of
22 Hair Design,' 'School of Esthetics,' 'School of Nail Care,' or 'School of Barbering' as
23 applicable; and all such signs shall also display the words 'Service by Students Only.'
24 Where service is rendered by a student, no commissions or premiums shall be paid to
25 such student for work done in the schools; nor shall any individual be employed by the
26 schools to render professional service to the public; and
27 (D) Provide transcripts to students upon graduation or withdrawal from the school,
28 provided that all tuition and fees due to the school have been satisfied. Student records
29 shall be maintained by the schools for a minimum of five years. If a school closes its
30 business, the owner is required to provide copies of all student records, including, but
31 not limited to, transcripts, to the board within 30 days of the school closure.
32 (2) All schools of cosmetology, schools of hair design, schools of esthetics, schools of
33 nail care, and schools of barbering shall keep in a conspicuous place as determined by the
34 board through rules and regulations in such schools a copy of the rules and regulations
35 adopted by the board.
36 (3) All master cosmetologists, hair designers, estheticians, nail care technicians, master
37 barbers, and barbers II who take an apprentice pursuant to Code Section 43-10-14 shall
38 file immediately with the board through the division director the name and age of such
39 apprentice; and the board shall cause such information to be entered on a register kept by
40 the division director for that purpose.
41 (b) Any person desiring to operate or conduct a school of cosmetology, school of hair
42 design, school of esthetics, school of nail care, or school of barbering prior to opening shall
H. B. 684
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0533
43 first secure from the board a license to do so and shall keep the license prominently
44 displayed in the school in a location determined by the board through rules and regulations.
45 (c) The board shall have the authority to pass upon the qualifications, appointments,
46 courses of study, and hours of study in the school of cosmetology, school of hair design,
47 school of esthetics, school of nail care, or school of barbering, provided that:
48 (1) All schools of cosmetology shall be required to teach the following courses: theory,
49 permanent and cold hair waving, hair coloring, hair bleaching, hair relaxing, hair
50 straightening, trichology training, hair and scalp treatments, massaging the face, neck,
51 and scalp, hair and scalp conditioning, hair cutting and shaping, hairdressing,
52 shampooing, styling, comb out, waxing, threading, tweezing, reception, desk work,
53 facials, makeup and arching, skin care, nail care, state law, board rules and regulations,
54 and any other subjects related to cosmetology and sanitation;
55 (1.1) All schools of hair design shall be required to teach the following courses: theory,
56 permanent and cold hair waving, hair coloring, hair bleaching, hair relaxing, hair
57 straightening, trichology training, hair and scalp treatments, massaging the scalp, hair and
58 scalp conditioning, hair cutting and shaping, hairdressing, shampooing, styling, comb out,
59 reception, desk work, state law, board rules and regulations, and any other subjects
60 related to hair design and sanitation;
61 (2) All schools of esthetics shall be required to teach the following courses: theory, skin
62 care, facials, makeup and arching, eyelash extensions, reception, desk work, massaging
63 the face, neck, décolletage, or arms, trimming, tweezing, or threading eyebrows and other
64 facial hair, dyeing, waxing, stimulating, cleansing, or beautifying, state law, board rules
65 and regulations, and any other subjects related to esthetics and sanitation;
66 (3) All schools of nail care shall be required to teach the following courses: theory,
67 trimming, filing, shaping, decorating, sculpturing and artificial nails, nail care,
68 pedicuring, reception, desk work, state law, board rules and regulations, and any other
69 subjects related to nail care and sanitation; and
H. B. 684
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0533
70 (4) All schools of barbering shall be required to teach the following courses: theory,
71 trichology training, hair and scalp treatments, massaging the face, neck, and scalp,
72 shampooing and conditioning, shaving, coloring of hair, hair cutting and styling, facial
73 hair design, facial hair waxing, permanent and cold hair waving, hair relaxing, hair
74 straightening, chemical application, reception, desk work, state law, board rules and
75 regulations, and any other subjects related to barbering and sanitation.
76 (d)(1) The board shall have the right to suspend or revoke the certificate, permit, or
77 license of or to reprimand any such school of cosmetology, school of esthetics, school of
78 hair design, school of nail care, school of barbering or instructor or teacher therein, for
79 the violation of this chapter.
80 (2) The board shall have the same power and authority as to sanitary conditions over
81 schools as it has over beauty shops, beauty salons, and barber shops.
82 (e)(1) All teachers or instructors shall devote their entire time to instruction of students.
83 Any individual desiring to teach or instruct in any school of cosmetology, school of
84 esthetics, school of hair design, school of nail care, or school of barbering shall first file
85 his or her application with the division director for a license, shall pay a fee in such
86 amount as shall be set by the board by rules and regulations, and shall successfully pass
87 both a written and a practical examination to become an instructor.
88 (2)(A) An individual desiring to teach at the master level shall satisfy the board that he
89 or she:
90 (i) Holds a current master cosmetologist certificate of registration and is a high
91 school graduate, has a state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma, or has
92 a postsecondary education or college degree;
93 (ii) Has 750 hours of instructor training in cosmetology at a board approved school,
94 50 hours of which shall consist of trichology training; and
95 (iii) Has one year of work experience as a master cosmetologist.
H. B. 684
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0533
96 (B) An individual holding a current master cosmetologist certificate of registration at
97 the master level who is a high school graduate, has a state approved high school
98 equivalency (HSE) diploma, or has a postsecondary education or college degree; who
99 has completed the required board approved hours of continuing education; and has
100 board approved work experience as an instructor or in education may, at the board's
101 discretion, be permitted to take the written and the practical examination to become an
102 instructor at the master level.
103 (3)(A) An individual desiring to teach at the esthetician level shall satisfy the board
104 that he or she:
105 (i) Holds a current certificate of registration as an esthetician or master cosmetologist
106 and is a high school graduate, has a state approved high school equivalency (HSE)
107 diploma, or has a postsecondary education or college degree;
108 (ii) Has 500 hours of board approved instructor training in esthetics of at least nine
109 months;
110 (iii) Has one year of work experience as an esthetician or master cosmetologist; and
111 (iv) Has passed both a written and a practical examination to become an instructor
112 in esthetics.
113 (B) An individual holding a current cosmetology certificate of registration as an
114 esthetician or master cosmetologist who is a high school graduate, has a state approved
115 high school equivalency (HSE) diploma, or has a postsecondary education or college
116 degree; who has completed the required board approved hours of continuing education;
117 and has board approved work experience as an instructor or in education may, at the
118 board's discretion, be permitted to take the written and the practical examination to
119 become an instructor at the esthetician level.
120 (4)(A) An individual desiring to teach at the nail technician level shall satisfy the board
121 that he or she:
H. B. 684
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0533
122 (i) Holds a current certificate of registration as a nail technician or master
123 cosmetologist and is a high school graduate, has a state approved high school
124 equivalency (HSE) diploma, or has a postsecondary education or college degree;
125 (ii) Has 250 hours of board approved instructor training in nail care of at least four
126 months;
127 (iii) Has one year of work experience as a nail technician or master cosmetologist;
128 and
129 (iv) Has passed both a written and a practical examination to become an instructor
130 in nail care.
131 (B) An individual holding a current certificate of registration as a nail technician or
132 master cosmetologist who is a high school graduate, has a state approved high school
133 equivalency (HSE) diploma, or has a postsecondary education or college degree; who
134 has completed the required board approved hours of continuing education; and has
135 board approved work experience as an instructor or in education may, at the board's
136 discretion, be permitted to take the written and the practical examination to become an
137 instructor at the nail technician level.
138 (5)(A) An individual desiring to teach barbering shall satisfy the board that he or she:
139 (i) Holds a current certificate of registration as a master barber and is a high school
140 graduate, has a state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma, or has a
141 postsecondary education or college degree;
142 (ii) Has 750 hours of board approved instructor training in barbering, 50 hours of
143 which shall consist of trichology training; and
144 (iii) Has passed both a written and a practical examination to become an instructor
145 in barbering.
146 (B) An individual holding a current certificate of registration as a master barber who
147 is a high school graduate, has a state approved high school equivalency (HSE) diploma,
148 or has a postsecondary education or college degree; who has completed the required
H. B. 684
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0533
149 board approved hours of continuing education; and has board approved work
150 experience as an instructor or in education may, at the board's discretion, be permitted
151 to take the written and the practical examinations to become an instructor for barbering.
152 (6)(A) An individual desiring to teach at the hair designer level shall satisfy the board
153 that he or she:
154 (i) Holds a current certificate of registration as a hair designer or master
155 cosmetologist and is a high school graduate, has a state approved high school
156 equivalency (HSE) diploma, or has a postsecondary education or college degree;
157 (ii) Has 750 hours of board approved instructor training in hair design of at least four
158 months, 50 hours of which shall consist of trichology training;
159 (iii) Has one year of work experience as a hair designer or master cosmetologist; and
160 (iv) Has passed both a written and a practical examination to become an instructor
161 in hair design.
162 (B) An individual holding a current certificate of registration as a hair designer or
163 master cosmetologist who is a high school graduate, has a state approved high school
164 equivalency (HSE) diploma, or has a postsecondary education or college degree; who
165 has completed the required board approved hours of continuing education; and has
166 board approved work experience as an instructor or in education may, at the board's
167 discretion, be permitted to take the written and the practical examinations to become
168 an instructor at the hair designer level.
169 (7) Any teacher or instructor shall renew his or her certificate of registration to teach in
170 accordance with the rules and regulations of the division director governing expiration
171 dates of certificates of registration by remitting with his or her application a renewal fee
172 in such amount as shall be set by the board by regulation; provided, however, that any
173 teacher or instructor who fails to renew his or her certificate of registration to practice as
174 a cosmetologist, esthetician, or nail technician on or before the date established by the
175 board by regulation shall automatically have his or her certificate of registration to teach
H. B. 684
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0533
176 or instruct suspended. A person failing to renew his or her certificate of registration of
177 a teacher or instructor at the end of the late renewal period following the expiration date
178 shall be required to pay a reinstatement fee.
179 (8) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as preventing an individual from
180 obtaining a certificate of registration as teacher or instructor who is certified by the
181 Department of Education to teach cosmetology in the state public schools. The
182 certification shall be limited to those individuals who hold a current certificate of
183 registration as a master cosmetologist and also hold a diploma or certificate of 1,500
184 credit hours from a board approved school and have completed the three-year teachers
185 training program required by the Department of Education. Such persons shall also pass
186 both a written and a practical examination satisfactory to the board and, upon passage
187 thereof, shall receive a certificate of registration to teach cosmetology.
188 (f) All teachers or instructors of cosmetology at all levels seeking renewal of certificates
189 of registration are required to submit to the board proof of completion of 15 hours of
190 continuing education in the cosmetology profession approved by the board at least half of
191 which consists of instruction in teaching methods.
192 (g)(1) As used in this Code section, the term:
193 (A) 'Trichology' means the science of the structure, function, and diseases of human
194 hair, including, without limitation, alopecia.
195 (B) 'Trichology training' means instruction regarding trichology and the provision of
196 hair care services to individuals who suffer from one or more diseases of human hair,
197 including, without limitation, alopecia.
198 (2) All trichology training requirements applicable to teachers or instructors under this
199 Code section shall be completed at postsecondary educational institutions that provide
200 courses in trichology and trichology training that are approved by the Nonpublic
201 Postsecondary Education Commission or the board.
H. B. 684
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0533
202 (3) Any person who holds a current certification of registration to teach or instruct as of
203 June 30, 2025, shall not be required to complete any trichology training required under
204 this Code section to maintain such certification or registration; provided, however, that
205 such person shall complete such trichology training before such certification or
206 registration may be renewed under this Code section.
207 (4) All courses in trichology training that are required to be taught by schools of
208 cosmetology, schools of hair design, and schools of barbering under this Code section
209 shall consist of no less than 30 hours of instruction."
210 SECTION 2.
211 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 684
- 9 -